Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4302
Definitions, where found.

As used in the Agricultural Liming Materials Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in sections 2-4303 to 2-4318.01 shall apply.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 2;

Laws 1983, LB 539, § 1.